Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1588
Disposal, defined.

Disposal shall mean the isolation and final disposition of radioactive waste from the biosphere by emplacement in a facility that employs technology dictated by a zero-release objective.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 11;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 6.